Arkansas, session 2025, SB52.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Auditor of State for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) DEPUTY AUDITOR 1 $165,160
(2) ATTORNEY 1 $138,585
(3) CHIEF OF STAFF 1 $126,675
(4) INTERNAL AUDITOR/CPA 1 $126,675
*JAR029*
04-07-2025 17:33:42 JAR029

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB52
(5) IT TECH 1 $126,675
(6) ASST CHIEF OF STAFF/ACCOUNTING DEPT MANAGER 1 $91,175
(7) DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 $81,710
(8) ACCOUNTING TECH III 3 $81,710
(9) DATA PROCESSING TECH II 1 $81,710
(10) COMMUNICATIONS TECH 1 $81,710
(11) DATA PROCESSING TECH I 1 $65,630
(12) OUTREACH MGR 1 $65,630
(13) OUTREACH TECH 1 $65,630
(14) EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE AUDITOR 1 $65,630
(15) ACCOUNTING TECH II 2 $65,630
(16) ACCOUNTING TECH I 2 $47,255
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 20

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Auditor of State for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five (5) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the State Central Services Fund,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Auditor of State -
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,753,495
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 701,398
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 615,450
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 33,000
(C) PROF. FEES 35,000
04-07-2025 17:33:42 JAR029

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB52
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 25,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,193,343

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - UNCLAIMED PROPERTY PROGRAM. There is
hereby established for the Auditor of State - Unclaimed Property Program for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) ASST. CHIEF OF STAFF/UCP OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 $126,675
(2) UCP COMPLIANCE MANAGER 1 $91,175
(3) UCP CLAIMS MANAGER 1 $91,175
(4) ASST UCP CLAIMS MANAGER II 1 $73,230
(5) ASST UCP CLAIMS MANAGER I 1 $73,230
(6) UCP COMPLIANCE AGENT 1 $65,630
(7) UCP CLAIMS EXAMINER II 2 $65,630
(8) UCP CLAIMS EXAMINER I 2 $65,630
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 10

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - UNCLAIMED PROPERTY PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Auditor of
State - Unclaimed Property Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $783,635
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 313,454
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 713,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,000
(C) PROF. FEES 1,120,000
04-07-2025 17:33:42 JAR029

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB52
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 25,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) DATA MATCH 1,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,985,089

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - PAYMENT OF UNCLAIMED PROPERTY CLAIMS - CASH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for operating expenses and
the payment of claims of the Auditor of State - Unclaimed Property Program
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) OPERATING EXPENSES $2,500
(02) PAYMENT OF UNCLAIMED PROPERTY CLAIMS 35,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $35,002,500

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - PAYMENT OF UNCLAIMED MINERAL PROCEEDS -
CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable
from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for operating expenses
and the payment of claims for abandoned mineral proceeds of the Auditor of
State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) OPERATING EXPENSES $500
(02) PAYMENT OF CLAIMS FOR ABANDONED
MINERAL PROCEEDS 2,500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,500,500

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, and prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, the Auditor of State is authorized to transfer
appropriation from any line item authorized in Operations to any other line
04-07-2025 17:33:42 JAR029

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB52
item authorized in Operations and the Agency is authorized to transfer
appropriation from any line item authorized in Unclaimed Property Program to
any other line item authorized in Unclaimed Property Program.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
POSITION REQUIREMENTS. The Internal Auditor shall hold and maintain an
active certification as a Certified Internal Auditor, with the Institute of
Internal Auditors, or a Certified Public Accountant license in good standing
in the state of Arkansas.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 11. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 12. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
04-07-2025 17:33:42 JAR029

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB52
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

























04-07-2025 17:33:42 JAR029